Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3402
Sections, purposes.

The purpose of sections 44-3401 to 44-3408 is to establish minimum standards for readability of language used in policies of life insurance, sickness and accident insurance, credit life insurance, and credit accident and health insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this state. Sections 44-3401 to 44-3408 are not intended to change the risks assumed by insurers subject to the act, nor to change their obligation to comply with the substance of other insurance laws applicable to life, sickness and accident, credit life, or credit accident and health insurance policies. Sections 44-3401 to 44-3408 are not intended to prevent flexibility and innovation in the development of policy forms or content nor to require standard policy forms or content.

Laws 1979, LB 415, § 2.